Utah statutes.
23-17-7.   Falconry authorized.

The Wildlife Board may authorize the practice of falconry within the state of Utah and the capturing and keeping in possession of birds to be used in the practice of falconry under rules and regulations specified by it.



Enacted by Chapter 46, 1971 General Session

